Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 22. BONDS--COUNTY, MUNICIPAL, ETC.

CHAPTER 8. SINKING FUNDS--INVESTMENTS, ETC.

Art. 842. FEDERAL FARM LOAN BONDS. All bonds issued under and by virtue of the Federal Farm Loan Act, approved by the President of the United States, July 17, 1916, and all consolidated bonds, bonds, debentures, and other similar obligations issued by virtue of the Farm Credit Act of 1971, P.L. 92-181, approved by the President of the United States, December 10, 1971, and as thereafter amended, shall be a lawful investment for all fiduciary and trust funds in this State, and may be accepted as security for all public deposits where deposits of bonds or mortgages are authorized by law to be accepted. Such bonds shall be lawful investments for all funds which may be lawfully invested by guardians, administrators, trustees and receivers, for saving departments of banks incorporated under the laws of Texas, for banks, savings banks and trust companies chartered under the laws of Texas, and for all insurance companies chartered or transacting business under the laws of Texas, where investments are required or permitted by the laws of this State.

Acts 1917, p. 122.

Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1252, ch. 455, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1973.

Art. 842a. SECURITIES ISSUED BY FEDERAL AGENCIES; TEXAS SECURITIES; INVESTMENTS. Hereafter, all mortgages, bonds, debentures, notes, collateral trust certificates, and other such evidences of indebtedness, issued or that hereafter may be issued under the terms and provisions of the National Housing Act, approved by the President of the United States on June 27, 1934, as amended and as may hereafter be amended, and all "insured accounts" issued or that may hereafter be issued by any institution insured under the provisions of Title IV of the National Housing Act, approved June 27, 1934, as amended and as may hereafter be amended, or any evidences of indebtedness or accounts that may be issued or insured by any lawful agency created thereunder, all mortgages, bonds, consolidated bonds issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, P.L. 92-181, and as thereafter amended, debentures, notes, collateral trust certificates, or other such evidences of indebtedness, which have been or which may hereafter be issued by the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, or any Federal Home Loan Bank, or the Home Owners' Loan Corporation, or by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation, or by the Federal Farm Loan Board, or by any Federal Land Bank, the Federal Intermediate Credit Banks, or Banks for Cooperatives, or by any National Mortgage Association, or by any entity, corporation or agency, which has been or which may be created by or authorized by any Act, which has been enacted or which may hereafter be enacted by the Congress of the United States, or by any amendment thereto, which has for its purpose the relief of, refinancing of or assistance to owners of mortgaged or incumbered homes, farms, and other real estate, and the improvement or financing or the making of loans on any real property, shall hereafter be lawful investments for all fiduciary and trust funds in this State, and may be accepted as security for all public deposits where deposits of bonds, consolidated bonds issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, P.L. 92-181, and as thereafter amended, or mortgages are authorized by law to be accepted. Such mortgages, bonds, consolidated bonds issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, P.L. 92-181, and as thereafter amended, debentures, notes, collateral trust certificates and other such evidences of indebtedness, insured accounts shall be lawful investments for all funds which may be lawfully invested by guardians, administrators, trustees, and receivers, for building and loan associations, savings departments of banks, incorporated under the laws of Texas, for banks, savings banks and trust companies, chartered under the laws of Texas, and all insurance companies of every kind and character, chartered or transacting business under the laws of Texas, where investments are required or permitted by the laws of this State; providing further that where such mortgages, bonds, consolidated bonds issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, P.L. 92-181, and as thereafter amended, debentures, notes, collateral trust certificates, and other such evidences of indebtedness are issued against and secured by promissory notes, or other obligations, the payment of which is secured in whole or in part, by mortgage, deed of trust, or other valid first lien upon real estate situated in Texas, or where such mortgages, bonds, consolidated bonds issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, P.L. 92-181, and as thereafter amended, debentures, notes, collateral trust certificates, or other such evidences of indebtedness are acquired, directly or indirectly, in exchange for or in substitution of notes, or other obligations, secured by mortgage, deed of trust, or other valid first lien upon real estate situated in Texas, or where such "insured accounts" are issued by building and loan associations chartered under the laws of Texas or by Federal Savings and Loan Associations domiciled in Texas, then such mortgages, bonds, consolidated bonds issued under the Farm Credit Act of 1971, P.L. 92-181, and as thereafter amended, debentures, notes, collateral trust certificates or other such evidences of indebtedness, "insured accounts," so issued and so secured, or so acquired or insured, shall be regarded for investment purposes by insurance companies as "Texas Securities," within the meaning of the laws of Texas governing such investments.

The provisions of this Act shall be cumulative of all other provisions of the Civil Statutes of the State of Texas, affecting the investment of funds or moneys by fiduciaries, guardians, administrators, trustees and receivers, building and loan associations, savings departments of banks, incorporated and doing business under the laws of Texas, commercial banks, savings banks and trust companies, chartered and doing business under the laws of Texas, insurance companies of any kind and character, chartered and transacting business under the laws of Texas, and all corporate creatures, organized and doing business under the laws of Texas.

It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent to enact a separate provision of this Act independent of all other provisions, and the fact that any phrase, sentence, or clause of this Act shall be declared unconstitutional, shall in no event affect the validity of any of the provisions hereof.

Acts 1933, 43rd Leg., p. 406, ch. 160, Sec. 1. Amended by Acts 1935, 44th Leg., p. 33, ch. 12, Sec. 1; Acts 1935, 44th Leg., p. 90, ch. 31, Sec. 1; Acts 1941, 47th Leg., p. 1356, ch. 618, Sec. 1; Acts 1961, 57th Leg., p. 1119, ch. 507, Sec. 1.

Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 1252, ch. 455, Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 1973.

Art. 842a-1. OBLIGATIONS WHOLLY OR PARTLY INSURED BY UNITED STATES OR STATE, INVESTMENT IN. Savings and loan associations, banks, insurance companies, and other corporations or other organizations, similar or dissimilar, are hereby authorized to lend, and to buy and sell for their own account, obligations in which except as to value of property and dignity of lien thereon securing the obligation it is otherwise lawful for such investor to invest its own funds, (by direct loan or by purchase), if the entire amount of the indebtedness is insured or guaranteed in any manner by the United States or by this State; or, if not so wholly insured or guaranteed, the difference between the entire amount of the indebtedness and that portion thereof insured or guaranteed by the United States or by this State, does not exceed the amount permissible under the law of this State, and meets the requirements thereof as to value of property and dignity of lien thereon, provided; further authorizing that any such lender may make an unsecured loan not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500), if at least one-half thereof is guaranteed pursuant to the Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944.

Acts 1945, 49th Leg., p. 315, ch. 230, Sec. 1.